Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.315.275

Notice of elections.

Notice of special elections as provided for in RCW 28A.315.265 shall be given by the county auditor as provided in RCW 29A.52.355. The notice of election shall state the purpose for which the election has been called and contain a description of the boundaries of the proposed new district and a statement of any terms of adjustment of bonded indebtedness on which to be voted.

[ 2015 c 53 s 6; 1999 c 315 s 704.]